Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1431XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1431XD (5) 91
je/jh

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 261B.8, subsection 2, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
2. Fees provided for in subsection 1 shall be set by rule
not more than once each year and shall be based upon the costs
of administering this chapter.
Sec. 2. Section 261B.8, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 2A. The commission shall collect a single,
nonrefundable annual authorization fee from each entity
authorized by the commission under section 261B.11 or 714.18
that does not pay a registration fee under subsection 1 or
chapter 261G. Commencing with the fiscal year beginning July
1, 2025, the fee amounts provided in this subsection shall be
in effect. The commission may increase the fee annually by
an amount not to exceed three percent. For the purposes of
this subsection, “primary location” means the physical location
of the main campus of an entity, or the physical location of
the corporate office of an entity if there is not a physical
campus.
a. For an entity granted an exemption under section 261B.11
with a primary location in Iowa, two thousand dollars.
b. For an entity granted an exemption under section 261B.11
with a primary location outside of Iowa, three thousand five
hundred dollars.
c. For an entity subject to section 714.18 with a primary
location in Iowa, two thousand dollars.
d. For an entity subject to section 714.18 with a primary
location outside of Iowa, three thousand five hundred dollars.